en: Audio player/recorder features: AI-powered; Built-in memory; CD player; Cassette player; Emergency alerts; FM radio; GPS support; MP3 playback; Memory card slot; Noise reduction; Rechargeable battery; Recording function; Remote control; Speakerphone; Speech recognition; Variable speed playback; Voice control; Waterproof; Other
ja: オーディオプレーヤー/レコーダーの機能: AI搭載; 内蔵メモリ; CDプレーヤー; カセットプレーヤー; 緊急アラート; FMラジオ; GPSサポート; MP3再生; メモリカードスロット; ノイズ低減; 充電式バッテリー; 録音機能; リモコン; スピーカーフォン; 言語認識; 可変速再生; 音声コントロール; 防水; その他
hr-HR: Značajke uređaja za reprodukciju/ snimanje zvuka: Pokreće umjetna inteligencija; Ugrađena memorija; Uređaj za reprodukciju CD-ova; Kazetofon; Upozorenja o opasnosti; FM radio; Podrška za GPS; MP3 reprodukcija; Utor za memorijsku karticu; Smanjenje buke; Punjiva baterija; Funkcija snimanja; Upravljanje na daljinu; Spikerfon; Prepoznavanje govora; Promjenjiva brzina reprodukcije; Glasovno upravljanje; Vodootporan; Ostalo
sk-SK: Funkcie audio prehrávača/rekordéra: Podporovaný umelou inteligenciou; Vstavaná pamäť; CD prehrávač; Kazetový prehrávač; Núdzové upozornenia; FM rádio; Podpora GPS; Prehrávanie MP3; Slot na pamäťovú kartu; Zníženie hluku; Nabíjateľná batéria; Funkcia nahrávania; Diaľkové ovládanie; Hlasitý odposluch; Rozpoznávanie reči; Prehrávanie s premenlivou rýchlosťou; Ovládanie hlasom; Vodotesný; Iné
fi: Audiosoittimen/-tallentimen ominaisuudet: Tekoälyllä toimiva; Sisäänrakennettu muisti; CD-soitin; Kasettisoitin; Hätähälytykset; FM-radio; GPS-tuettu; MP3-toisto; Muistikorttipaikka; Melun vähentäminen; Uudelleenladattava akku; Tallennustoiminto; Kauko-ohjain; Kaiutinpuhelin; Äänentunnistus; Vaihteleva nopeuden toisto; Ääniohjaus; Vedenkestävä; Muu
th: คุณลักษณะเครื่องเล่นเสียง/เครื่องบันทึก: ขับเคลื่อนด้วย AI; หน่วยความจำภายในตัว; เครื่องเล่นซีดี; เครื่องเล่นเทป; การแจ้งเตือนเหตุฉุกเฉิน; คลื่นวิทยุเอฟเอ็ม; รองรับ GPS; การเล่น MP3; ช่องเสียบการ์ดหน่วยความจำ; การลดเสียงรบกวน; แบตเตอรี่แบบชาร์จใหม่ได้; ฟังก์ชันการบันทึก; รีโมตควบคุม; สปีกเกอร์โฟน; เทคโนโลยีรู้จำเสียงพูด; การเล่นที่ปรับความเร็วได้; การควบคุมเสียง; กันน้ำ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Funkcije predvajalnika/snemalnika zvoka: Poganja UI; Vgrajen pomnilnik; CD-predvajalnik; Kasetofon; Opozorila v sili; FM-radio; GPS-podpora; Predvajanje MP3; Reža za pomnilniško kartico; Zmanjšanje hrupa; Polnilna baterija; Funkcija snemanja; Daljinsko upravljanje; Zvočnik; Prepoznavanje govora; Predvajanje s spremenljivo hitrostjo; Glasovno upravljanje; Vodoodporno; Drugo
hu: Hanglejátszó/-felvevő funkciók: AI-alapú; Beépített memória; CD-lejátszó; Kazettás lejátszó; Vészhelyzeti riasztások; FM rádió; GPS-támogatás; MP3-lejátszás; Memóriakártya-hely; Zajcsökkentés; Újratölthető akkumulátor; Rögzítés funkció; Távvezérlés; Kihangosító; Beszédfelismerés; Változtatható sebességű lejátszás; Hangvezérlés; Vízálló; Egyéb
tr: Ses oynatıcı/kaydedici özellikleri: Yapay zeka destekli; Dahili hafıza; CD çalar; Kaset çalar; Acil durum uyarıları; FM radyo; GPS desteği; MP3 çalma; Hafıza kartı yuvası; Gürültü azaltma; Şarj edilebilir pil; Kayıt işlevi; Uzaktan kumanda; Hoparlör; Konuşma tanıma; Değişken hızda oynatma; Ses kontrolü; Su geçirmez; Diğer
cs: Vlastnosti audio přehrávače/rekordéru: S umělou inteligencí; Integrovaná paměť; Přehrávač CD; Kazetový přehrávač; Nouzová upozornění; FM Rádio; Podpora GPS; Přehrávání MP3; Slot pro paměťovou kartu; Snížení hluku; Dobíjecí baterie; Funkce nahrávání; Dálkové ovládání; Reproduktor; Rozpoznávání hlasu; Variabilní rychlost přehrávání; Hlasové ovládání; Voděodolný; Jiné
zh-TW: 音訊播放器/錄音機功能: AI 驅動; 內建記憶體; CD 播放機; 卡帶播放器; 緊急警報; 調頻收音機; 支援 GPS; MP3 播放; 記憶卡插槽; 降噪; 可充電電池; 錄製功能; 遠端控制; 免持電話; 語音辨識; 變速播放; 語音控制; 防水; 其他
it: Funzionalità del lettore/registratore audio: Alimentato dall'intelligenza artificiale; Memoria integrata; Lettore CD; Lettore di cassette; Avvisi di emergenza; Radio FM; Supporto GPS; Riproduzione MP3; Capacità della scheda di memoria; Riduzione del rumore; Batteria ricaricabile; Funzione di registrazione; Telecomando; Vivavoce; Riconoscimento vocale; Riproduzione a velocità variabile; Controllo vocale; Impermeabile; Altro
sv: Detaljer för ljudspelare/inspelare: AI-driven; Inbyggt minne; CD spelare; Kassettbandspelare; Nödlarm; FM-radio; GPS-stöd; MP3-uppspelning; Minneskortplats; Brusreducering; Laddningsbart batteri; Inspelningsfunktion; Fjärrkontroll; Högtalartelefon; Taligenkänning; Uppspelning med varierande hastighet; Röststyrning; Vattensäker; Övrigt
lt-LT: Garso grotuvo / įrašymo įrenginio funkcijos: Veikia DI pagrindu; Integruota atmintis; CD grotuvai; Kasečių grotuvas; Avariniai įspėjimai; FM radijo imtuvas; GPS palaikymas; MP3 atkūrimas; Atminties kortelės lizdas; Triukšmo slopinimas; Įkraunama baterija; Įrašymo funkcija; Nuotolinis valdymas; Garsiakalbis su mikrofonu; Kalbos atpažinimas; Kintamo greičio atkūrimas; Valdymas balsu; Atsparūs vandeniui; Kita
ru: Характеристики устройства для воспроизведения или записи звука: На базе ИИ; Встроенная память; CD-проигрыватель; Кассетный проигрыватель; Экстренные оповещения; FM-радио; Поддержка GPS; Воспроизведение MP3; Слот для карты памяти; Шумоподавление; Перезаряжаемый аккумулятор; Функция записи; Дистанционное управление; Микрофон с громкоговорителем; Распознавание речи; Воспроизведение с переменной скоростью; Голосовое управление; Водонепроницаемый; Другое
pl: Charakterystyka odtwarzacza/nagrywarki audio: Obsługiwany przez sztuczną inteligencję; Wbudowana pamięć; Odtwarzacz CD; Odtwarzacz kasetowy; Alerty awaryjne; Radio FM; Obsługa GPS; Odtwarzanie MP3; Gniazdo karty pamięci; Redukcja szumów; Akumulator; Funkcja nagrywania; Zdalne sterowanie; Głośnomówiące; Rozpoznawanie mowy; Odtwarzanie ze zmienną prędkością; Sterowanie głosowe; Wodoszczelny; Inne
da: Funktioner for lydafspiller/optager: AI-drevet; Indbygget hukommelse; CD-afspiller; Kassetteafspiller; Nødalamer; FM-radio; GPS-support; MP3-afspilning; Port til hukommelseskort; Støjreduktion; Genopladeligt batteri; Optagefunktion; Fjernbetjening; Højttalertelefon; Talegenkendelse; Variabel hastighedsplayback; Stemmekontrol; Vandtæt; Andet
nl: Functies voor audiospeler/recorder: AI-aangedreven; Ingebouwd geheugen; Cd-speler; Cassettespeler; Noodwaarschuwingen; FM-radio; GPS ondersteuning; Mp3-weergave; Ingang voor geheugenkaart; Ruisreductie; Oplaadbare batterij; Opnamefunctie; Afstandsbediening; Luidspreker; Spraakherkenning; Afspelen met variabele snelheid; Spraakbesturing; Waterdicht; Andere
de: Audio-Player/Recorder-Funktionen: KI-gestützt; Eingebauter Arbeitsspeicher; CD-Player; Kassettenspieler; Notfallwarnungen; FM-Radio; GPS-Unterstützung; MP3-Wiedergabe; Speicherkartensteckplatz; Lärmminderung; Wiederaufladbare Batterie; Aufnahmefunktion; Fernsteuerung; Freisprecheinrichtung; Spracherkennung; Wiedergabe mit variabler Geschwindigkeit; Sprachsteuerung; Wasserdicht; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Функции на аудиоплейър/рекордер: Задвижван от AI; Вградена памет; CD плейър; Касетофон; Сигнали за спешни случаи; FM радио; Поддръжка на GPS; Възпроизвеждане на MP3; Слот за карта с памет; Намаляване на шума; Акумулаторна батерия; Функция за запис; Дистанционно управление; Високоговорител; Разпознаване на реч; Възпроизвеждане с променлива скорост; Гласово управление; Водоустойчив; Други
es: Características del reproductor/grabador de audio: Con tecnología de IA; Memoria incorporada; Reproductores de CD; Reproductor de casete; Alertas de emergencia; Radio FM; Compatible con GPS; Reproducción de MP3; Ranura para tarjeta de memoria; Reducción de ruido; Batería recargable; Función de grabación; Control remoto; Manos libres; Reconocimiento de voz; Reproducción de velocidad variable; Control por voz; Impermeable; Otros
vi: Tính năng phát/ghi âm thanh: Hỗ trợ bởi AI; Bộ nhớ trong; Máy nghe đĩa CD; Máy cát-xét; Cảnh báo khẩn cấp; Radio FM; Hỗ trợ GPS; Phát MP3; Khe cắm thẻ nhớ; Giảm ồn; Pin sạc; Chức năng ghi; Điều khiển từ xa; Loa ngoài; Nhận dạng giọng nói; Phát lại tốc độ thay đổi; Điều khiển bằng giọng nói; Chống thấm nước; Khác
pt-BR: Recursos de reprodutor/gravador de áudio: Com IA; Memória incorporada; Leitor de CD; Leitor de cassetes; Alertas de emergência; Rádio FM; Suporte a GPS; Reprodução de MP3; Slot para cartão de memória; Redução de ruído; Bateria recarregável; Função de gravação; Controle remoto; Viva-voz; Reconhecimento de voz; Reprodução em velocidade variável; Controle de voz; À prova d'água; Outro
ko: 오디오 플레이어/레코더 기능: AI 기반; 내장 메모리; CD 플레이어; 카세트 플레이어; 긴급 경보; FM 라디오; GPS 지원; MP3 재생; 메모리 카드 슬롯; 소음 감소; 충전식 배터리; 녹음 기능; 원격 제어; 스피커폰; 음성 인식; 가변 속도 재생; 음성 제어; 방수; 기타
fr: Fonctionnalités du lecteur/enregistreur audio: Doté d’une IA; Mémoire intégrée; Lecteur CD; Lecteur de cassettes; Alertes d’urgence; Radio FM; Prise en charge du GPS; Lecture MP3; Emplacement pour carte mémoire; Réduction de bruit; Batterie rechargeable; Fonction d’enregistrement; Télécommande; Haut-parleur; Reconnaissance vocale; Lecture à vitesse variable; Commande vocale; Imperméable; Autre
nb: Lydspiller-/opptakerfunksjoner: KI-drevet; Innebygd minne; CD-spiller; Kassettspiller; Nødvarsler; FM-radioer; GPS-støtte; MP3-avspilling; Minnekortstørrelse; Støyreduksjon; Oppladbart batteri; Opptaksfunksjon; Fjernkontroll; Høyttalertelefon; Talegjenkjenning; Variabel hastighetsavspilling; Talekontroll; Vannsikker; Annet
ro-RO: Caracteristici player/dispozitiv înregistrare audio: Pe bază de AI; Memorie integrată; CD player; Casetofon; Alerte de urgență; Radio FM; Suport GPS; Redare MP3; Fantă card de memorie; Reducerea zgomotului; Baterie reîncărcabilă; Funcție de înregistrare; Telecomandă; Difuzor; Recunoașterea vorbirii; Redare cu viteză variabilă; Control vocal; Impermeabil; Altele
zh-CN: 音频播放器/录音机功能: AI 赋能; 内置内存; CD 播放机; 磁带播放机; 紧急警报; 调频收音机; 支持 GPS; MP3 播放; 存储卡插槽; 降噪; 可充电电池; 录音功能; 远程控制; 扬声电话; 语音识别; 变速播放; 语音控制; 防水; 其他
el: Χαρακτηριστικά συσκευής αναπαραγωγής/εγγραφής ήχου: Με τεχνολογία ΑΙ; Ενσωματωμένη μνήμη; Αναπαραγωγή CD; Κασετόφωνο; Ειδοποιήσεις έκτακτης ανάγκης; Ραδιόφωνο FM; Υποστήριξη GPS; Αναπαραγωγή MP3; Υποδοχή κάρτας μνήμης; Μείωση θορύβου; Επαναφορτιζόμενη μπαταρία; Λειτουργία εγγραφής; Τηλεχειρισμός; Μεγάφωνο; Αναγνώριση ομιλίας; Αναπαραγωγή μεταβλητής ταχύτητας; Φωνητικός έλεγχος; Αδιάβροχο; Άλλο
pt-PT: Características de leitor/gravador de áudio: Alimentado por IA; Memória incorporada; Leitor de CD; Leitor de cassetes; Alertas de emergência; Rádio FM; Suporte de GPS; Reprodução de MP3; Ranhura do cartão de memória; Redução de ruído; Bateria recarregável; Função de gravação; Controlo remoto; Sistema mãos-livres; Reconhecimento de voz; Reprodução em velocidade variável; Controlo por voz; Impermeável; Outro